Illinois, session 104th, SB714.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 143.17 and 143.29 and by adding Article 6XLVIII as follows: 7    (215 ILCS 5/143.17)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.17)8    Sec. 143.17. Notice of intention not to renew. 9    a. No company shall fail to renew any policy of insurance, 10as defined in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of Section 11143.13, to which Section 143.11 applies, unless it shall send 12by mail to the named insured at least 30 days advance notice of 13its intention not to renew. The company shall maintain proof 14of mailing of such notice on a recognized U.S. Post Office form 15or a form acceptable to the U. S. Post Office or other 16commercial mail delivery service. The nonrenewal shall not 17become effective until at least 30 days from the proof of 18mailing date of the notice to the name insured. Notification 19shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if known, or the 20agent of record, if known, and to the last known mortgagee or 21lien holder. For purposes of this Section, the mortgagee or 22lien holder, insured's broker, or the agent of record may opt 23to accept notification electronically. However, where   SB0714 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, the notice of 2cancellation must be mailed at least 10 days before the 3effective date of the cancellation.4    b. This Section does not apply if the company has 5manifested its willingness to renew directly to the named 6insured. Such written notice shall specify the premium amount 7payable, including any premium payment plan available, and the 8name of any person or persons, if any, authorized to receive 9payment on behalf of the company. If no person is so 10authorized, the premium notice shall so state.11    b-5. This Section does not apply if the company manifested 12its willingness to renew directly to the named insured. 13However, no company may impose renewal premium increases of 14more than 10% for lines of business enumerated in subsection 15(a) of Section 143.13 to which Section 143.11 applies unless 16the company mails or delivers by electronic means, in 17compliance with Section 143.34, to the named insured the 18increase in renewal premium at least 30 days prior to the 19renewal or anniversary date. No no company may impose changes 20in deductibles or coverage for any policy forms applicable to 21an entire line of business enumerated in subsections (a), (b), 22(c), and (h) of Section 143.13 to which Section 143.11 applies 23unless the company mails or delivers by electronic means, in 24compliance with Section 143.34, to the named insured written 25notice of the change in deductible or coverage at least 60 days 26prior to the renewal or anniversary date.   SB0714 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1    Notice shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if 2known, or the agent of record. For purposes of this subsection 3b-5, policyholder-initiated changes to coverage and exposure 4changes are not included in the renewal premium increases that 5require a company to provide notice to the insured. 6    c. Should a company fail to comply with (a) or (b) of this 7Section, the policy shall terminate only on the effective date 8of any similar insurance procured by the insured with respect 9to the same subject or location designated in both policies.10    d. Renewal of a policy does not constitute a waiver or 11estoppel with respect to grounds for cancellation which 12existed before the effective date of such renewal.13    e. In all notices of intention not to renew any policy of 14insurance, as defined in Section 143.11 the company shall 15provide the named insured a specific explanation of the 16reasons for nonrenewal.17    f. For purposes of this Section, the insured's broker, if 18known, or the agent of record and the mortgagee or lien holder 19may opt to accept notification electronically. 20    g. The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act 21of the 104th General Assembly apply to renewal premium notices 22sent on or after July 1, 2027. 23(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 24    (215 ILCS 5/143.29)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.29)25    Sec. 143.29. (a) The rates and premium charges for every   SB0714 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1policy of automobile liability insurance shall include 2appropriate reductions as determined by the insurer for any 3insured over age 55 upon successful completion of the National 4Safety Council's Defensive Driving Course or a motor vehicle 5crash prevention course, including an eLearning course, that 6is found by the Secretary of State to meet or exceed the 7standards of the National Safety Council's Defensive Driving 8Course's 4-hour 8 hour classroom safety instruction program or 9eLearning course.10    (b) The premium reduction shall remain in effect for the 11qualifying insured for a period of 3 years from the date of 12successful completion of the crash prevention course, except 13that the insurer may elect to apply the premium reduction 14beginning either with the last effective date of the policy or 15the next renewal date of the policy if the reduction will 16result in a savings as though applied over a full 3 year 17period. An insured who has completed the course of instruction 18prior to July 1, 1982 shall receive the insurance premium 19reduction for only the period remaining within the 3 years 20from course completion. The period of premium reduction for an 21insured who has repeated the crash prevention course shall be 22based upon the last such course the insured has successfully 23completed.24    (c) Any crash prevention course approved by the Secretary 25of State under this Section shall be taught by an instructor 26approved by the Secretary of State, shall consist of at least 4   SB0714 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1hours 8 hours of classroom or eLearning equivalent instruction 2and shall provide for a certificate of completion. Records of 3certification of course completion shall be maintained in a 4manner acceptable to the Secretary of State.5    (d) Any person claiming eligibility for a rate or premium 6reduction shall be responsible for providing to his insurance 7company the information necessary to determine eligibility.8    (e) This Section shall not apply to:9        (1) any motor vehicle which is a part of a fleet or is 10    used for commercial purposes unless there is a regularly 11    assigned principal operator.12        (2) any motor vehicle subject to a higher premium rate 13    because of the insured's previous motor vehicle claim 14    experience or to any motor vehicle whose principal 15    operator has been convicted of violating any of the motor 16    vehicle laws of this State, until that operator shall have 17    maintained a driving record free of crashes and moving 18    violations for a continuous one year period, in which case 19    such driver shall be eligible for a reduction the 20    remaining 2 years of the 3 year period.21        (3) any motor vehicle whose principal operator has had 22    his drivers license revoked or suspended for any reason by 23    the Secretary of State within the previous 36 months.24        (4) any policy of group automobile insurance under 25    which premiums are broadly averaged for the group rather 26    than determined individually.  SB0714 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1(Source: P.A. 102-397, eff. 1-1-22; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 2    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)3ARTICLE XLVIII. RATES FOR AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE 4    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)5    Sec. 1801. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 6promote the public welfare by regulating automobile insurance 7rates so that the rates will not be excessive, inadequate, or 8unfairly discriminatory. Nothing in this Article is intended 9to prohibit or discourage reasonable competition or to 10authorize or encourage, except to the extent necessary to 11accomplish the purpose of this Article, uniformity in 12insurance rates, rating systems, rating plans, or practices. 13This Article shall be liberally construed to carry into effect 14the provisions of this Section. 15    (215 ILCS 5/1802 new)16    Sec. 1802. Applicability. 17    (a) This Article applies to policies of automobile 18insurance, as defined in subsection (a) of Section 143.13 of 19this Code, to which Section 143.11 of this Code applies.20    (b) The provisions of this Article apply only to filings 21made on or after July 1, 2027.  22    (215 ILCS 5/1803 new)  SB0714 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1    Sec. 1803. Rate standards; excessive, inadequate, or 2unfairly discriminatory. 3    (a) Rates shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly 4discriminatory.5    (b) A rate is inadequate if it endangers the solvency of 6the insurer.7    (c) A rate is unfairly discriminatory if, after allowing 8for practical limitations, the price differentials fail to 9reflect the difference in expected losses and expenses. A rate 10is not unfairly discriminatory if different rates result for 11policyholders with similar loss exposures but different 12expenses, or similar expenses but different loss exposures, so 13long as the rate reflects the differences with reasonable 14accuracy.15    (d) A rate is reasonable and not excessive, inadequate, or 16unfairly discriminatory if it is an actuarially sound estimate 17of the expected value of all future costs associated with an 18individual risk transfer. 19    (215 ILCS 5/1804 new)20    Sec. 1804. Determinations and notice; hearing. 21    (a) If the Department determines through actuarial review 22that a filing is excessive, inadequate, or unfairly 23discriminatory pursuant to Section 1803, the Department shall 24send the company notice, within 40 days after receipt of a 25complete filing, either through the System for Electronic   SB0714 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1Rates and Forms Filing (SERFF) or another filing system 2determined by the Department, specifying: (1) in what respects 3the filing fails to meet the requirements of this Article and 4(2) if applicable, any modifications that are required. The 5notice shall specify a reasonable period after which the 6filing is no longer effective if the company fails to timely 7request a hearing under subsection (b). If the company timely 8requests a hearing under subsection (b), the filing shall 9remain in effect until the conclusion of the hearing and a 10final order is issued. If the Department finds that a rate is 11excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory pursuant to 12this Article, the final order may specify a reasonable period 13after which the filing is no longer effective and any rebates 14that must be remitted to affected consumers. Failure of the 15Department to provide timely notice under this Section within 1640 days after the receipt of a complete filing as defined in 17subsection (d) shall result in the filing being deemed 18compliant with this Article. The 40-day period in which the 19Department is authorized under this Section to determine a 20filing is excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory is 21neither waivable nor subject to extension.22    (b) The company may request a hearing on the notice within 2330 days after receipt. Failure to request a hearing within 30 24days shall be deemed the company's acceptance of the 25Department's determination. Failure by the Department to hold 26the requested hearing within 40 days after the request, and to   SB0714 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1resolve the outcome of the hearing within 60 days after the 2hearing date or the filing of post-briefing submissions 3allowed by the Hearing Officer, whichever is later, shall 4result in the dismissal of the Department's notice and shall 5cause the filing to remain in effect. 6    (c) The action of the Director in objecting to a filing 7under this Article is subject to judicial review under the 8Administrative Review Law. 9    (d) A complete filing consists of a rate filing that 10contains all new or revised rates, a new or revised rate 11manual, including new or revised rate manual rules, and any 12experience, judgment, and interpretation of the statistical 13data relied upon by the company. If the Department finds that 14the filing is incomplete, then the Department must provide 15notice to the company within 15 days after receipt of the 16filing or the date the filing is deemed complete. The notice 17must set forth the documents or other information that is 18required to complete the filing. If such notice is provided, 19the filing is deemed complete after the additional information 20specified by the Department in its notice is provided by the 21company to the Department.  22    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)23    Sec. 1805. Prohibition on cost-shifting. Credible 24State-specific loss experience shall be used in the 25development of rates whenever such data is available and   SB0714 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07013 BAB 17050 b1statistically reliable. To meet actuarial standards of 2credibility, insurers may supplement State-specific loss 3experience with countrywide, regional, or out-of-state loss 4experience. Nothing in this Section shall apply to rating 5relativity development during ratemaking. This Section shall 6only apply to companies issuing policies that are subject to 7this Article.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92027.